Hawaii, session 2026, HB1750.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 188, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§188-     Uhu and kala; temporary restrictions.  (a)  No person shall intentionally or knowingly take by spearing after sunset or before sunrise any uhu (parrotfish, family Scaridae) or kala (bluespine unicornfish, Naso unicornis) in state marine waters around the island of Oahu. (b) No person on the island of Oahu shall engage in the commercial sale of any uhu or kala that has been taken by spearing. (c) The prohibitions under this section shall remain in effect until the division of aquatic resources' Holomua marine initiative process implements new regulations that will recover uhu and kala populations to levels that prevent seaweed from smothering corals pursuant to rules adopted by the board for the island of Oahu.  Upon the adoption of the regulations under the division of aquatic resources' Holomua marine initiative process pursuant to rules adopted by the board, this section shall be void." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2026. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________